Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1155.
do enact as follows:AB1155,11Section 1. 253.17 of the statutes is created to read:AB1155,2,32253.17 Protection of pregnant individuals’ information. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:AB1155,2,74(a) “Health information” means information or data, except age or gender, 5whether oral or recorded in a form or medium, created by or derived from an 6unregulated pregnancy center or an individual that relates to one or more of the 7following:AB1155,3,211. The past, present, or future physical, mental, or behavioral health or 2condition of an individual.AB1155,3,432. A service provided to or discussed with the individual, including any 4pregnancy-related service.AB1155,3,75(b) “Unregulated pregnancy center” means a pregnancy services center that 6does not directly provide, or provide referrals for, abortions or emergency 7contraception and is not covered by medical privacy laws.AB1155,3,108(c) “Nonpublic personal health information” means health information that 9identifies an individual who is the subject of the information or health information 10that there is a reasonable basis to believe could be used to identify an individual.AB1155,3,1511(d) “Pregnancy-related service” means a medical or counseling service related 12to pregnancy, pregnancy prevention, or pregnancy termination, including 13contraception and contraceptive counseling, pregnancy testing, pregnancy 14diagnosis, pregnancy options counseling, obstetric ultrasound, obstetric sonogram, 15or prenatal care.AB1155,3,2116(e) “Pregnancy services center” means a facility, including a mobile facility, 17the primary purpose of which is to provide services to individuals who are or may 18be pregnant and that offers obstetric ultrasounds, obstetric sonograms, or prenatal 19care to pregnant individuals or has the appearance of a medical facility. A 20pregnancy services center has the appearance of a medical facility if at least 2 of the 21following apply:AB1155,3,23221. The facility offers obstetric ultrasounds, obstetric sonograms, pregnancy 23testing or diagnosis, or prenatal care to pregnant clients.AB1155,3,24242. The facility has staff or volunteers who wear medical attire or uniforms.AB1155,4,113. The facility contains one or more examination tables.AB1155,4,324. The facility contains a private or semiprivate room or area containing 3medical supplies or medical instruments.AB1155,4,545. The facility has staff or volunteers who collect health information from 5clients.AB1155,4,866. The facility shares space with a credentialed health care provider or is 7located on the same premises as a medical facility approved by the department or a 8credentialed health care provider.AB1155,4,129(2) Authorization required for disclosure. (a) Disclosure prohibited. An 10unregulated pregnancy center may not disclose nonpublic personal health 11information about an individual unless an authorization is obtained from the 12individual whose nonpublic personal health information is sought to be disclosed.AB1155,4,1913(b) Exceptions. An unregulated pregnancy center may disclose nonpublic 14personal health information without authorization if disclosure is required to 15comply with federal, state, or local laws, a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, 16investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, or local authorities, or to 17cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that the 18business, service provider, or third party reasonably and in good faith believes may 19violate federal, state, or local laws.AB1155,4,2220(c) Valid authorization. 1. A valid authorization to disclose nonpublic 21personal health information shall be in written or electronic form and shall contain 22all of the following:AB1155,4,2423a. The identity of the individual who is the subject of the nonpublic personal 24health information.AB1155,5,21b. A general description of the types of nonpublic personal health information 2to be disclosed.AB1155,5,53c. General descriptions of the parties to whom the unregulated pregnancy 4center discloses nonpublic personal health information, the purpose of the 5disclosure, and how the information will be used.AB1155,5,86d. The signature of the individual who is the subject of the nonpublic personal 7health information or the individual who is legally empowered to grant authority 8and the date signed.AB1155,5,119e. Notice of the length of time for which the authorization is valid, notice that 10the individual may revoke the authorization at any time, and the procedure for 11making a revocation.AB1155,5,17122. Before an unregulated pregnancy center may obtain an authorization from 13an individual under this subsection, the unregulated pregnancy center shall, as 14part of its explanation of the authorization form, provide a verbal disclosure to the 15individual that the unregulated pregnancy center is not a covered entity for 16purposes of the federal privacy regulations promulgated under the federal Health 17Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.AB1155,5,2018(d) Duration of authorization. An authorization under this subsection shall 19specify a length of time for which the authorization may remain valid, which may 20not exceed 24 months.AB1155,5,2421(e) Revocation of authorization. An individual who is the subject of nonpublic 22personal health information may revoke an authorization provided under this 23section at any time, subject to the rights of an unregulated pregnancy center that 24acted in reliance on the authorization prior to notice of the revocation.AB1155,6,41(f) Record of authorization. An unregulated pregnancy center shall retain an 2authorization and any revocation of the authorization, or copies of the authorization 3and any revocation of the authorization, for 6 years in the record of the individual 4who is the subject of nonpublic personal health information.AB1155,6,85(g) Nondiscrimination. An unregulated pregnancy center may not unfairly 6discriminate against an individual because that individual has not granted 7authorization for the disclosure of nonpublic personal health information under this 8section.AB1155,6,149(3) Data breach. An unregulated pregnancy center that maintains, stores, 10or manages computerized nonpublic personal health information shall provide 11notice of any breach of the security of the system following determination of the 12breach of the security of the system to any individual whose personal information 13was or is reasonably believed to have been accessed and acquired by an 14unauthorized person.AB1155,6,1615(4) Violation. Any person who violates this section engages in an unfair and 16deceptive trade practice in violation of s. 100.20.AB1155,217Section 2. Effective date.AB1155,6,1918(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 19publication.AB1155,6,2020